Hawaii, session 2026, GM1326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that digital financial
asset transaction kiosks pose a significant risk to the
financial security of the residents of the State. Digital
financial asset transaction kiosks - also known as
cryptocurrency Automated Teller Machines or cryptoATMs - enable
a customer to buy and sell digital financial assets from a
wallet or exchange. After providing the digital financial asset
transaction kiosk with identification, which can range from a
phone number to a scan of a government-issued identification,
the customer enters the address of the wallet that will receive
the purchased digital financial asset. The address could be the
customer’s own wallet or that of a third party. Finally, the
customer inserts cash or a debit or credit card into the machine
to finalize the purchase of the digital financial asset.
The legislature further finds that due to their ease of
use, digital financial asset transaction kiosks are increasingly
being used to facilitate scam payments. Typically, criminals
2026-3328 HB1642 GDI HMSO
iiiiniiniiMiiiiiiniii

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
target older individuals through unsolicited calls, posing as
the government, a bank, information technology support, or the
customer service representative of a company. Once contact is
made, the scammer provides detailed instructions to the
prospective victim, including how to withdraw cash from the
victim's bank, locate the kiosk, circumvent a kiosk's
safeguards, and deposit and send funds using the kiosk to the
wallet the scammer controls. After providing the instructions,
the scammer stays in constant contact with the prospective
victim until the payment is completed.
The legislature also finds that after the scams are
complete, victims face significant barriers to recovering their
losses. First, scammers quickly route funds to offshore
platforms once the transactions are complete, which makes it
very difficult to recover from the scammers. Second, the
operators have consistently argued that, while the cash may be
in the machine, the victim's money has already been transferred
to the scammer, and the operator is unable to assist the victim
in recovering the money.
The legislature finds that the proliferation of digital
financial asset transaction kiosks and their increased use to
2026-3328 HB1642 GDI HMSO

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
facilitate scam payments has led to Americans losing millions of
dollars. In 2024, the Federal Bureau of Investigation's
Internet Crime Complaint Center received more than 10,956
complaints reporting the use of kiosks, with reported victim
losses of approximately $246,700,000. That represents a ninety-
nine per cent increase in the number of complaints and thirty-
one per cent increase in reported victim losses from 2023. In
the first six months of 2025, Americans lost around $240,000,000
in kiosk scams, a rate that is twice as high as in 2024.
Furthermore, several independent investigations, including
investigations by the attorneys general for the District of
Columbia and Iowa, have determined that a significant portion of
transactions - as high as ninety per cent - were fraudulent
transactions. Therefore, these kiosks pose a significant threat
to the financial safety of the residents of this State.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to prohibit,
beginning October 1, 2026, the ownership, operation, or
management of a digital financial asset transaction kiosk that
accepts United States currency from a customer in exchange for a
digital financial asset.
2026-3328 HB1642 CDl HMSO 3

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Chapter 481B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§481B- Digital financial asset transaction kiosks;
prohibition on deposits. (a) Beginning October 1, 2026, it
shall be an unlawful practice under this chapter for an operator
to own, operate, or manage in the State a digital financial
asset transaction kiosk that accepts United States currency from
a customer in exchange for a digital financial asset.
(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an operator
from owning, operating, or managing in the State a digital
financial asset transaction kiosk that accepts a digital
financial asset from a customer in exchange for:
(1) A different digital financial asset; or
(2) United States currency.
(c) Each transaction in violation of subsection (a) shall
be a separate offense.
(d) As used in this section:
"Cash" means physical United States currency, including
coins and paper currency.
2026-3328 HB1642 CDl HMSO
■■■iiiMiilinniiiii

Page 5 1642
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
"Digital financial asset" means a digital representation of
value that is used as a medium of exchange, unit of account, or
store of value, and that is not legal tender, regardless of
whether denominated in legal tender. "Digital financial asset"
does not include:
(1) A transaction in which a merchant grants, as part of
an affinity or rewards program, value that cannot be
taken from or exchanged with the merchant for legal
tender, bank or credit union credit, or a digital
financial asset;
(2) A digital representation of value issued by or on
behalf of a publisher and used solely within an online
game, game platform, or family of games sold by the
same publisher or offered on the same game platform;
or
(3) A security registered with or exempt from registration
with the United States Securities and Exchange
Commission or a security registered or exempt from
registration under chapter 485A.
"Digital financial asset transaction kiosk" means an
electronic information processing device that is capable of
2026-3328 HB1642 CDl HMSO
nmiHiiiiiiMinii

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
accepting or dispensing United States currency by means of
credit card or cash in exchange for a digital financial asset.
"Operator" means a person who owns^ operates^ or manages a
digital financial asset transaction kiosk located in the State."
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3328 HB1642 CDl HMSO 6

H.B. NO.
T,
h
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 9th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1642, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certily that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1642, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
105-26